District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1962

Prior leave; promulgation of rules.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1952, ch. 81, § 2
Aug. 5, 1953, 67 Stat. 362, ch. 320, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 20, 29 DCR 49

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1032.
1973 Ed., § 31-698a.

Prior Codifications